incubator/apertium-zh_CN-zh_TW/apertium-zh_CN-zh_TW.zh_TW.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
        <alphabet>討厭</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
	   <sdef n="n"/>
	   <sdef n="vblex"/>
	   <sdef n="adj"/>
	   <sdef n="part"/>
	   <sdef n="count"/>
	   <sdef n="sg"/>
	   <sdef n="pl"/>
	   <sdef n="prn"/>
	</sdefs>
	
	<pardefs>
		<pardef n="我__prn">
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l/>
			   <r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l>們</l>
			   <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="愛人__n">
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l/>
			   <r><s n="n"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="愛__vblex">
			<e>
			   <p>
				 <l/>
				 <r><s n="vblex"/></r>
			   </p>
			</e>
		</pardef>
	</pardefs>

		<e lm="我"><i>我</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="你"><i>你</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="您"><i>您</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="他"><i>他</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="她"><i>她</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="它"><i>它</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="咱"><i>咱</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="辦法"><i>辦法</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="北邊"><i>北邊</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="錶"><i>錶</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="菜"><i>菜</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="車"><i>車</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="成績"><i>成績</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="床"><i>床</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="詞"><i>詞</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="打算"><i>打算</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="道理"><i>道理</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="弟弟"><i>弟弟</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="電車"><i>電車</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="電影"><i>電影</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="東西"><i>東西</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="兒子"><i>兒子</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="法文"><i>法文</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="方法"><i>方法</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="飛機"><i>飛機</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="服務員"><i>服務員</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="鋼筆"><i>鋼筆</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="工廠"><i>工廠</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="公共汽車"><i>公共汽車</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="館"><i>館</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="過去"><i>過去</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="漢語"><i>漢語</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="黑板"><i>黑板</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="湖"><i>湖</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="回答"><i>回答</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="火車"><i>火車</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="機器"><i>機器</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="家庭"><i>家庭</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="江"><i>江</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="教育"><i>教育</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="姐姐"><i>姐姐</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="經驗"><i>經驗</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="句子"><i>句子</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="開始"><i>開始</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="課文"><i>課文</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="老師"><i>老師</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="裡邊兒"><i>裡邊兒</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="臉"><i>臉</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="流"><i>流</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="媽媽"><i>媽媽</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="妹妹"><i>妹妹</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="麵條兒"><i>麵條兒</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="母親"><i>母親</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="內"><i>內</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="年紀"><i>年紀</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="農民"><i>農民</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="派"><i>派</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="批評"><i>批評</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="蘋果"><i>蘋果</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="錢"><i>錢</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="牆"><i>牆</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="秋"><i>秋</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="人們"><i>人們</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="日文"><i>日文</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="商店"><i>商店</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="上午"><i>上午</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="聲音"><i>聲音</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="勝利"><i>勝利</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="食堂"><i>食堂</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="市"><i>市</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="書"><i>書</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="水果"><i>水果</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="宿舍"><i>宿舍</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="糖"><i>糖</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="條件"><i>條件</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="同志"><i>同志</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="外邊"><i>外邊</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="外語"><i>外語</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="晚上"><i>晚上</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="屋子"><i>屋子</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="下邊"><i>下邊</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="消息"><i>消息</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="新聞"><i>新聞</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="星期五"><i>星期五</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="學院"><i>學院</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="夜"><i>夜</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="意義"><i>意義</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="友誼"><i>友誼</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="月亮"><i>月亮</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="站"><i>站</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="中學"><i>中學</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="週五"><i>週五</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="字"><i>字</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="變化"><i>變化</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="感冒"><i>感冒</i><par n="愛人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="擺"><i>擺</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="辦"><i>辦</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="抱"><i>抱</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="比"><i>比</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="變"><i>變</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="表示"><i>表示</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="表演"><i>表演</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="擦"><i>擦</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="參加"><i>參加</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="差"><i>差</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="朝"><i>朝</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="吃"><i>吃</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="抽"><i>抽</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="出發"><i>出發</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="穿"><i>穿</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="打"><i>打</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="戴"><i>戴</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="代表"><i>代表</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="倒"><i>倒</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="得"><i>得</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="低"><i>低</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="丟"><i>丟</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="動"><i>動</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="鍛煉"><i>鍛煉</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="餓"><i>餓</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="發生"><i>發生</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="發展"><i>發展</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="翻譯"><i>翻譯</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="方便"><i>方便</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="放"><i>放</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="分"><i>分</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="服務"><i>服務</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="複習"><i>複習</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="改"><i>改</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="感到"><i>感到</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="感謝"><i>感謝</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="搞"><i>搞</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="跟"><i>跟</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="刮/颳"><i>刮/颳</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="關"><i>關</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="過"><i>過</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="喊"><i>喊</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="喝"><i>喝</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="還"><i>還</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="會"><i>會</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="寄"><i>寄</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="加"><i>加</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="建設"><i>建設</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="教育"><i>教育</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="解決"><i>解決</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="進來"><i>進來</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="經驗"><i>經驗</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="開"><i>開</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="咳嗽"><i>咳嗽</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="來"><i>來</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="例如"><i>例如</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="了"><i>了</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="留念"><i>留念</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="買"><i>買</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="念"><i>念</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="派"><i>派</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="騎"><i>騎</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="去"><i>去</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="認為"><i>認為</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="生活"><i>生活</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="使用"><i>使用</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="收拾"><i>收拾</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="說"><i>說</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="算"><i>算</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="討論"><i>討論</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="提高"><i>提高</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="停"><i>停</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="推"><i>推</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="完成"><i>完成</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="為"><i>為</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="喜歡"><i>喜歡</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="像"><i>像</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="謝謝"><i>謝謝</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="休息"><i>休息</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="研究"><i>研究</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="以為"><i>以為</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="有"><i>有</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="願意"><i>願意</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="展覽"><i>展覽</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="長"><i>長</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="知道"><i>知道</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="祝"><i>祝</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="組織"><i>組織</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
